src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language describe the entities nouns refer to.

LEXICON Adjectives
adjective    Comparisons   ;

bəsad+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəsad A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
bəɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
cək̓ʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}cək̓ʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
cəwəɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}cəwəɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
dᶻixʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}dᶻixʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
haʔɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}haʔɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
hikʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}hikʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
kay̓kay̓alus+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kay̓kay̓alus A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
miʔman̓+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}miʔman̓ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
q̓ič+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}q̓ič A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
stabaɬ+A:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tabaɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
tagʷəxʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tagʷəxʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
taqʷuʔ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}taqʷuʔ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
təɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}təɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
wix̌ʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}wix̌ʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
wələx̌ʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}wələx̌ʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
xʷəxʷaʔxʷəʔ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}xʷəxʷaʔxʷəʔ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ax̌aʔ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ax̌aʔ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ibəč̓+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ibəč̓ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌icil+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌icil A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ičəc+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ičəc A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌əɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌əɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌əɬəɬx̌əč+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌əɬəɬx̌əč A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ʷiqʷac+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ʷiqʷac A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ʷiqʷəq̓ʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ʷiqʷəq̓ʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
č̓uɬəyʔalus+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}č̓uɬəyʔalus A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
šəq+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}šəq A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
ɬaw̓t+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬaw̓t A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
